New Jersey, session 221, A2498.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a. The Department of Environmental Protection shall periodically, but at least annually at the appropriate season, survey and inspect all ponds, lakes, and other water bodies located in any State park or forest for the presence of duckweed (Lemna spp.). Whenever duckweed is detected at any such pond, lake, or other water body, the department shall erect a clear and conspicuous sign or signs at the pond, lake, or other water body warning of the presence of duckweed and the danger caused by its false appearance of being a solid surface to walk upon. b.    The Department of Environmental Protection, in consultation with the Department of Community Affairs, shall: (1)   develop educational materials on duckweed, including information on how to identify it, which shall be distributed to every county and municipality in the State for the purposes of section 2 of P.L.    , c.    (C.      ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill); (2)   develop the language to be used on the warning signs required pursuant to section 2 of P.L.    , c. (C.      ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), and produce an appropriate quantity of such signs for use by counties and municipalities; and (3)   distribute to any requesting county or municipality a sufficient number of signs needed by the county or municipality to comply with section 2 of P.L.    , c.    (C.      ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 2.    a.  Every county and municipality shall periodically, but at least once annually at the appropriate season, survey and inspect all ponds, lakes, and other water bodies located in any public park it owns for the presence of duckweed (Lemna spp.).  Whenever duckweed is detected at any such pond, lake, or other water body, the county or municipality, as the case may be, shall erect a clear and conspicuous sign or signs at the pond, lake, or other water body warning of the presence of duckweed and the danger caused by its false appearance of being a solid surface to walk upon. b.    A county or municipality may request the Department of Environmental Protection to supply it with a sufficient number of warning signs needed by the county or municipality to comply with the requirements of subsection a. of this section.  The department shall supply those signs as required pursuant to subsection b. of section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C.      ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.